Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6738YH (2) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2211 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 280.13H Participation in show choir 1 and marching band provided by public schools. 2 1. The board of directors of a school district shall allow 3 a student who resides within the school district and who is 4 enrolled in a nonpublic school to participate immediately in 5 show choir or marching band if provided by the school district 6 and not provided by the nonpublic school, pursuant to the terms 7 of an agreement between the board of directors of the school 8 district and the authorities in charge of the nonpublic school 9 that provide for the eligibility of the student. 10 2. The board of directors of a school district shall allow a 11 student who resides within a contiguous school district and who 12 is enrolled in a nonpublic school to participate immediately in 13 show choir or marching band if provided by the school district 14 and not provided by the nonpublic school or the studentâs 15 school district of residence, pursuant to the terms of an 16 agreement between the board of directors of the school district 17 and the authorities in charge of the nonpublic school that 18 provide for the eligibility of the student. 19 3. If the board of directors of a school district has 20 established a fee for the cost of a studentâs participation in 21 show choir or marching band, a student who is enrolled in a 22 nonpublic school and is participating in show choir or marching 23 band at a public school pursuant to subsection 1 or 2, or the 24 studentâs parent or guardian, shall be responsible for the 25 payment of such fee. The amount of such fee shall not exceed 26 the amount of the fee the board of directors of the school 27 district has established for students who are enrolled in the 28 school district. 29 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 30 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 31